Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.057

Judges—Residency requirement.

A judge of a municipal court need not be a resident of the city in which the court is created, but must be a resident of the county in which the city is located.

[ 1993 c 317 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1993 c 317: See notes following RCW 3.50.810.